Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,155
Pedestrians to use right half of crosswalk.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 45;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-645;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 251.